District of Columbia statutes.
47-340.14

Expiration.

If any series of bonds is not issued, sold, and delivered to the original purchaser within 3 years of the date of Council approval of a project pursuant to § 47-340.03, the authorization provided in this subchapter with respect to the issuance, sale, and delivery of such series of bonds shall expire.

Sept. 20, 1995, D.C. Law 11-46, § 15, 42 DCR 3603
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-340.14.